Hawaii statutes.
§149A-17 Sales, permit, and record. In
addition to licensing requirements applicable to pesticides, every person who
sells or distributes restricted use pesticides shall obtain an annual permit
from the department. Conditions, procedures, and fees for the permit shall
conform to the rules adopted under this section.

All persons permitted to sell restricted use
pesticides shall keep records of the individual sales of these pesticides.
Records shall be kept at the principal place of business of the permittee for a
period specified by the rules and shall be available to the department on
request. [L 1972, c 58, pt of §1; am L 1975, c 126, pt of §1; am L 1987, c 310,
§9]

Previous
Vol02_Ch0046-0115
Next